Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1,109
Consumer credit transactions; procedures; when applicable.

Sections 45-1,105 to 45-1,110 shall apply to all consumer credit transactions in this state subject to a security interest, as defined in subdivision (35) of section 1-201, Uniform Commercial Code, entered into, extended, or renewed on or after January 1, 1984.

Laws 1983, LB 111, § 5;

Laws 2005, LB 570, § 1.